Ohio, session 136, HB57.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That section 3313.6022 be amended and sections 3313.7119, 3313.7120,
ECTION
3314.148, 3326.62, and 3328.40 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
Sec. 3313.6022. (A) As used in this section, "released time" means a period of time during
which a student is excused from school to attend a course in religious instruction conducted by a
private entity off school district property.
(B) A school district board of education shall adopt a policy that authorizes a student to be
excused from school to attend a released time course in religious instruction for at least one period
per week, provided that each of the following applies:
(1) The student's parent or guardian gives written consent.
(2) The sponsoring entity maintains attendance records and makes them available to the
school district the student attends.
(3) Transportation to and from the place of instruction, including transportation for students
with disabilities, is the complete responsibility of the sponsoring entity, parent, guardian, or student.
(4) The sponsoring entity makes provisions for and assumes liability for the student.
(5) No public funds are expended and no public school personnel are involved in providing
the religious instruction.
(6) The student assumes responsibility for any missed schoolwork.
While in attendance in a released time course in religious instruction, a student shall not be
considered absent from school. No student may be released from a core curriculum subject course to
attend a religious instruction course.
(C) A school district board of education shall collaborate with a sponsoring entity of a
released time course in religious instruction to identify a time to offer the course during the school
day.
(D) A policy adopted under division (B) of this section shall not prohibit students from
bringing external educational and program materials into school.
(E) A Unless otherwise specified in a school district's policy adopted under division (B) of
this section, a student shall not exceed be excused from school to attend a released time course in

Sub. H. B. No. 57 136th G.A.
2
religious instruction for longer than either of the following:
(1) For students in an elementary or middle school, two periods in total per week;
(2) For students in high school, the amount of time that is equivalent to attending two units
of high school credit per week.
(F) A policy adopted under division (B) of this section may authorize high school students to
earn up to two units of high school credit for the completion of a released time course in religious
instruction. In determining whether to award credit for completion of such a course, the board shall
evaluate the course based on purely secular criteria that are substantially the same criteria used to
evaluate similar nonpublic high school courses for purposes of determining whether to award credit
for such courses to a student transferring from a nonpublic high school to a public high school.
However, there shall be no criteria requiring that released time courses be completed only at a
nonpublic school. The decision to award credit for a released time course of religious instruction
shall be neutral to, and shall not involve any test for, religious content or denominational affiliation.
For purposes of this division, secular criteria may include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(1) The number of hours of classroom instruction time;
(2) A review of the course syllabus that reflects course requirements and materials used;
(3) The methods of assessment used in the course;
(4) The qualifications of the course instructor, which shall be similar to the qualifications of
other teachers within the district.
Notwithstanding division (C)(8) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, high school credit
awarded to a student for a released time course in religious instruction may substitute for the same
amount of credit in subjects listed in that division.
(G) A school district, member of a school district board of education, or school district
employee is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury allegedly arising during a student's
transportation to or from a place of instruction when private transportation is used under a released
time policy adopted under this section. This division does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other
immunity or defense that a school district, member of a school district board of education, or school
district employee may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code
or under the common law of this state.
Sec. 3313.7119. (A) As used in this section, "overdose reversal drug" has the same meaning
as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code.
(B) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district that elects under
section 3715.50 of the Revised Code to obtain and maintain a supply of an overdose reversal drug
for use in an emergency situation shall require the district's board of education to adopt and
implement a policy regarding the supply's maintenance and drug's use at each school operated by the
district. A policy adopted under this section shall include all of the following:
(1) A requirement that each school conform to the requirements of division (C)(1) of section

Sub. H. B. No. 57 136th G.A.
3
3715.50 of the Revised Code;
(2) The amount of the drug's supply to be maintained at each school;
(3) A requirement that each school's supply be stored in a secure location that is easily
accessible to school employees or contractors;
(4) A description of any training regarding the supply's maintenance and drug's use that
school employees or contractors may be required to complete.
(C) A school district board of education may accept donations of money from any person or
entity to purchase overdose reversal drugs. A board shall use the donations only for that purpose and
shall track the expenditure of donated funds.
(D) As soon as practicable after using an overdose reversal drug in an emergency situation,
the superintendent of a district described in this section shall report its use to the district board of
education and the parent or guardian of the student to whom the drug was administered. The
superintendent of a district described in this section shall annually report the district's use of
overdose reversal drugs in emergency situations to the department of education and workforce.
(E) If the superintendent of a district described in this section determines that a persistent
pattern of overdoses at the district's schools has emerged, the superintendent shall notify the parent
or guardian of each student enrolled in the district.
(F) Not later than August 1, 2026, the department of education and workforce, in
consultation with the department of health, shall develop a model policy regarding the maintenance
and use of a supply of overdose reversal drugs. A school district board of education may adopt the
department's model policy to fulfill the requirements of this section.
Sec. 3313.7120. (A) A chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school that elects under section
3715.50 of the Revised Code to obtain and maintain a supply of an overdose reversal drug for use in
an emergency situation shall comply with all provisions of section 3313.7119 of the Revised Code
as if it were a school district.
(B) A chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school may accept donations of money from any
person or entity to purchase overdose reversal drugs. A school shall use the donations only for that
purpose and shall track the expenditure of donated funds.
Sec. 3314.148. (A) A community school established under this chapter that elects under
section 3715.50 of the Revised Code to obtain and maintain a supply of an overdose reversal drug
for use in an emergency situation shall comply with all provisions of section 3313.7119 of the
Revised Code as if it were a school district.
(B) A community school may accept donations of money from any person or entity to
purchase overdose reversal drugs. A school shall use the donations only for that purpose and shall
track the expenditure of donated funds.
Sec. 3326.62. (A) A STEM school established under this chapter that elects under section
3715.50 of the Revised Code to obtain and maintain a supply of an overdose reversal drug for use in
an emergency situation shall comply with all provisions of section 3313.7119 of the Revised Code

Sub. H. B. No. 57 136th G.A.
4
as if it were a school district.
(B) A STEM school may accept donations of money from any person or entity to purchase
overdose reversal drugs. A school shall use the donations only for that purpose and shall track the
expenditure of donated funds.
Sec. 3328.40. (A) A college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter that
elects under section 3715.50 of the Revised Code to obtain and maintain a supply of an overdose
reversal drug for use in an emergency situation shall comply with all provisions of section
3313.7119 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district.
(B) A college-preparatory boarding school may accept donations of money from any person
or entity to purchase overdose reversal drugs. A school shall use the donations only for that purpose
and shall track the expenditure of donated funds.
S 2. That existing section 3313.6022 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.
ECTION
S 3. No court shall award monetary damages for a claim brought under or otherwise
ECTION
arising out of section 3313.6022 of the Revised Code for alleged violations occurring from
September 30, 2025, to the effective date of this section. This provision shall not be construed as
creating a private right of action.

Sub. H. B. No. 57 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Sub. H. B. No. 57 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________